Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2091
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Notice of meeting.

(1) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors shall be preceded by at least two days' notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice shall not be required to describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 91.